dev/adjective/adjective.bn.dix
  <!-- ১৫তম; ১৫তম -->
    <pardef n="১৫তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অডিও; অডিও -->
    <pardef n="অডিও__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নগ্ন; নগ্ন -->
    <pardef n="নগ্ন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মৌলিক; মৌলিক -->
    <pardef n="মৌলিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নমনীয়; নমনীয় -->
    <pardef n="নমনীয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বিলম্বিত; বিলম্বিত -->
    <pardef n="বিলম্বিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আনন্দময়; আনন্দময় -->
    <pardef n="আনন্দময়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পেশাদার; পেশাদার -->
    <pardef n="পেশাদার__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ভূমিহীন; ভূমিহীন -->
    <pardef n="ভূমিহীন__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রত্যন্ত; প্রত্যন্ত -->
    <pardef n="প্রত্যন্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ফাঁকা; ফাঁকা -->
    <pardef n="ফাঁকা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ধর্মনিরপেক্ষ; ধর্মনিরপেক্ষ -->
    <pardef n="ধর্মনিরপেক্ষ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বাংলাদেশী; বাংলাদেশী -->
    <pardef n="বাংলাদেশী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অধিক; অধিক -->
    <pardef n="অধিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- সাম্প্রদায়িক; সাম্প্রদায়িক -->
    <pardef n="সাম্প্রদায়িক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অসাধারণ; অসাধারণ -->
    <pardef n="অসাধারণ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অতীত; অতীত -->
    <pardef n="অতীত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নৌ; নৌ -->
    <pardef n="নৌ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনেক; অনেক -->
    <pardef n="অনেক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- মৌলবাদী; মৌলবাদী -->
    <pardef n="মৌলবাদী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পবিত্র; পবিত্র -->
    <pardef n="পবিত্র__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ঐতিহ্যবাহী; ঐতিহ্যবাহী -->
    <pardef n="ঐতিহ্যবাহী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনুকূল; অনুকূল -->
    <pardef n="অনুকূল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কার্যনির্বাহী; কার্যনির্বাহী -->
    <pardef n="কার্যনির্বাহী__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- নয়; নয় -->
    <pardef n="নয়__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- একটানা; একটানা -->
    <pardef n="একটানা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আঞ্চলিক; আঞ্চলিক -->
    <pardef n="আঞ্চলিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রমাণিত; প্রমাণিত -->
    <pardef n="প্রমাণিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পূর্ণতর; পূর্ণ -->
    <pardef n="পূর্ণ/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বেমানান; বেমানান -->
    <pardef n="বেমানান__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- কৌশলগত; কৌশলগত -->
    <pardef n="কৌশলগত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পরিকল্পিত; পরিকল্পিত -->
    <pardef n="পরিকল্পিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অব্যবহৃত; অব্যবহৃত -->
    <pardef n="অব্যবহৃত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পর্যাপ্ত; পর্যাপ্ত -->
    <pardef n="পর্যাপ্ত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- প্রাসঙ্গিক; প্রাসঙ্গিক -->
    <pardef n="প্রাসঙ্গিক__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- ধীর; ধীর -->
    <pardef n="ধীর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তামিল; তামিল -->
    <pardef n="তামিল__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আবর্তিত; আবর্তিত -->
    <pardef n="আবর্তিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- অনুপস্থিত; অনুপস্থিত -->
    <pardef n="অনুপস্থিত__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- তুচ্ছতম; তুচ্ছ -->
    <pardef n="তুচ্ছ/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- পূর্ণতম; পূর্ণ -->
    <pardef n="পূর্ণ/তম__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তম<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="sup"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- আলাদা; আলাদা -->
    <pardef n="আলাদা__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- বলিষ্ঠ; বলিষ্ঠ -->
    <pardef n="বলিষ্ঠ__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r><s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

  <!-- উচ্চতর; উচ্চ -->
    <pardef n="উচ্চ/তর__adj">
      <e>
        <p>
          <l></l>
          <r>তর<s n="adj"/><s n="sint"/><s n="comp"/><s n="mf"/></r>
        </p>
      </e>
    </pardef>

    <e lm="১৫তম"><i>১৫তম</i><par n="১৫তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অডিও"><i>অডিও</i><par n="অডিও__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নগ্ন"><i>নগ্ন</i><par n="নগ্ন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মৌলিক"><i>মৌলিক</i><par n="মৌলিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নমনীয়"><i>নমনীয়</i><par n="নমনীয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বিলম্বিত"><i>বিলম্বিত</i><par n="বিলম্বিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আনন্দময়"><i>আনন্দময়</i><par n="আনন্দময়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পেশাদার"><i>পেশাদার</i><par n="পেশাদার__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ভূমিহীন"><i>ভূমিহীন</i><par n="ভূমিহীন__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রত্যন্ত"><i>প্রত্যন্ত</i><par n="প্রত্যন্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ফাঁকা"><i>ফাঁকা</i><par n="ফাঁকা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ধর্মনিরপেক্ষ"><i>ধর্মনিরপেক্ষ</i><par n="ধর্মনিরপেক্ষ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বাংলাদেশী"><i>বাংলাদেশী</i><par n="বাংলাদেশী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অধিক"><i>অধিক</i><par n="অধিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="সাম্প্রদায়িক"><i>সাম্প্রদায়িক</i><par n="সাম্প্রদায়িক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অসাধারণ"><i>অসাধারণ</i><par n="অসাধারণ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অতীত"><i>অতীত</i><par n="অতীত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নৌ"><i>নৌ</i><par n="নৌ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনেক"><i>অনেক</i><par n="অনেক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="মৌলবাদী"><i>মৌলবাদী</i><par n="মৌলবাদী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পবিত্র"><i>পবিত্র</i><par n="পবিত্র__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ঐতিহ্যবাহী"><i>ঐতিহ্যবাহী</i><par n="ঐতিহ্যবাহী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনুকূল"><i>অনুকূল</i><par n="অনুকূল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কার্যনির্বাহী"><i>কার্যনির্বাহী</i><par n="কার্যনির্বাহী__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="নয়"><i>নয়</i><par n="নয়__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="একটানা"><i>একটানা</i><par n="একটানা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আঞ্চলিক"><i>আঞ্চলিক</i><par n="আঞ্চলিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রমাণিত"><i>প্রমাণিত</i><par n="প্রমাণিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পূর্ণতর"><i>পূর্ণ</i><par n="পূর্ণ/তর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বেমানান"><i>বেমানান</i><par n="বেমানান__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="কৌশলগত"><i>কৌশলগত</i><par n="কৌশলগত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পরিকল্পিত"><i>পরিকল্পিত</i><par n="পরিকল্পিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অব্যবহৃত"><i>অব্যবহৃত</i><par n="অব্যবহৃত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পর্যাপ্ত"><i>পর্যাপ্ত</i><par n="পর্যাপ্ত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="প্রাসঙ্গিক"><i>প্রাসঙ্গিক</i><par n="প্রাসঙ্গিক__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="ধীর"><i>ধীর</i><par n="ধীর__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তামিল"><i>তামিল</i><par n="তামিল__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আবর্তিত"><i>আবর্তিত</i><par n="আবর্তিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="অনুপস্থিত"><i>অনুপস্থিত</i><par n="অনুপস্থিত__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="তুচ্ছতম"><i>তুচ্ছ</i><par n="তুচ্ছ/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="পূর্ণতম"><i>পূর্ণ</i><par n="পূর্ণ/তম__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="আলাদা"><i>আলাদা</i><par n="আলাদা__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="বলিষ্ঠ"><i>বলিষ্ঠ</i><par n="বলিষ্ঠ__adj"/></e>
    <e lm="উচ্চতর"><i>উচ্চ</i><par n="উচ্চ/তর__adj"/></e>
